Colorado, session 2026A, HB1261.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 9.4 to title
5 as follows:
ARTICLE 9.4
Consumer Protections for Motor Vehicle Liens
5-9.4-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 9.4, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
-2- HB26-1261

REQUIRES:
(1) "COVERED PERSON" MEANS A NATURAL PERSON THAT ENTERS
INTO A RETAIL INSTALLMENT CONTRACT OR LEASE FOR A QUALIFIED
MOTOR VEHICLE.
(2) "DISABLE A MOTOR VEHICLE" MEANS ACTIVATING, INCLUDING
BY REMOTE OR ELECTRONIC ACTIVATION, A DEVICE THAT PREVENTS
NORMAL OPERATION OF A MOTOR VEHICLE.
(3) (a) "QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE" MEANS A SELF-PROPELLED
VEHICLE THAT IS:
(I) REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED UNDER ARTICLE 3 OF TITLE 42,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE VEHICLE IS USED FOR PERSONAL,
HOUSEHOLD, OR BUSINESS PURPOSES; AND
(II) THE ONLY MOTOR VEHICLE OWNED BY A DEBTOR.
(b) "QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE" DOES NOT INCLUDE A FLEET
VEHICLE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-1-102 (36).
(4) "SECURED PARTY" MEANS A PERSON WITH A SECURITY
INTEREST IN A MOTOR VEHICLE.
(5) "SECURITY INTEREST" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 4-1-201 (35).
5-9.4-102. Applicability - conflict of laws.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING COMMON LAW OR A PROVISION OF A
CONTRACT, THIS ARTICLE 9.4 APPLIES TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF RIGHTS
UNDER A SECURITY INTEREST IN A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE. A
PROVISION OF A CONTRACT THAT WAIVES A RIGHT GRANTED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 9.4 IS VOID TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY FOR A COVERED PERSON
TO RETAIN THE RIGHT.
(2) IF A PROVISION IN THIS ARTICLE 9.4 CONFLICTS WITH A
-3- HB26-1261

PROVISION IN SECTION 4-9-609 OR ARTICLE 5 OF THIS TITLE 5, THE
PROVISION IN THIS ARTICLE 9.4 GOVERNS TO THE EXTENT THAT THE
CONFLICT APPLIES TO A SECURITY INTEREST IN A QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE PURCHASED BY A COVERED PERSON.
5-9.4-103. Cure of default.
(1) AFTER A COVERED PERSON'S DEFAULT CONSISTING ONLY OF
THE COVERED PERSON'S FAILURE TO MAKE A REQUIRED PAYMENT, A
CREDITOR SHALL NOT, BECAUSE OF THE DEFAULT, ACCELERATE MATURITY
OF THE UNPAID BALANCE OF THE OBLIGATION NOR TAKE POSSESSION OF OR
OTHERWISE ENFORCE A SECURITY INTEREST IN A QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE UNTIL SIXTY DAYS AFTER GIVING THE CONSUMER THE NOTICE OF
RIGHT TO CURE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 5-5-110.
(2) UNTIL THE EXPIRATION OF THE TIME PERIOD DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, A DEFAULT CONSISTING OF A FAILURE TO
MAKE A REQUIRED PAYMENT MAY BE CURED BY TENDERING TO THE
CREDITOR THE AMOUNT OF ALL UNPAID SUMS DUE AT THE TIME OF THE
TENDER, WITHOUT ACCELERATION, PLUS ANY UNPAID DELINQUENCY OR
DEFERRAL CHARGES. CURING THE DEFAULT RESTORES THE COVERED
PERSON'S RIGHTS UNDER THE AGREEMENT AS THOUGH THE DEFAULT DID
NOT OCCUR.
(3) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY:
(a) IF THE DEFAULT CONTINUES FOR ONE HUNDRED TWENTY DAYS
OR MORE; OR
(b) TO A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT DEFAULT.
(4) A SECURED PARTY MUST COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION IN ORDER
TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE.
5-9.4-104. Disabling motor vehicle prohibited.
-4- HB26-1261

A SECURED PARTY SHALL NOT DISABLE A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR THE
COVERED PERSON'S FAILURE TO MEET PAYMENT OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE
PURCHASE TRANSACTION ASSOCIATED WITH THE SECURITY INTEREST OR
PROMISSORY NOTE WHEN EXERCISING THE SECURED PARTY'S RIGHTS WITH
RESPECT TO COLLATERAL.
5-9.4-105. Qualified motor vehicle - right to cure after
repossession.
(1) A SECURED PARTY THAT HAS REPOSSESSED A QUALIFIED
MOTOR VEHICLE SHALL NOT DISPOSE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE UNTIL
FORTY-EIGHT DAYS AFTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS REPOSSESSED.
(2) WITHIN FORTY-EIGHT HOURS AFTER REPOSSESSING A
QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE, A SECURED PARTY SHALL NOTIFY THE
COVERED PERSON THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS BEEN REPOSSESSED AND
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO DISPOSITION FORTY-EIGHT DAYS
AFTER THE DATE OF REPOSSESSION UNLESS THE COVERED PERSON CURES
THE DEFAULT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION. THE
NOTICE MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE ACTUAL DATE THE QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT
TO DISPOSITION IF THE DEBTOR DOES NOT CURE THE DEFAULT;
(b) THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO CURE THE DEFAULT UNDER
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION;
(c) THE ACCEPTABLE FORMS OF PAYMENT TO CURE THE DEFAULT;
AND
(d) THE NAME OF, ADDRESS OF, AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE
SECURED PARTY.
(3) TO CURE A DEFAULT THAT CAUSED THE REPOSSESSION OF A
QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE, THE COVERED PERSON MUST PAY THE
-5- HB26-1261

OVERDUE AMOUNT PLUS THE REASONABLE COST OF REPOSSESSING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE.
(4) (a) IF A COVERED PERSON FAILS TO CURE A DEFAULT WITHIN
FORTY-EIGHT DAYS AFTER THE REPOSSESSION OF A QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE, THE SECURED PARTY MAY DISPOSE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PART 6 OF ARTICLE 9 OF TITLE 4 AND ARTICLE 5 OF
THIS TITLE 5.
(b) IF A COVERED PERSON CURES A DEFAULT WITHIN FORTY-EIGHT
DAYS AFTER THE REPOSSESSION OF A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE, THE
SECURED PARTY SHALL RETURN THE MOTOR VEHICLE AND RESTORE THE
COVERED PERSON'S RIGHTS UNDER THE SECURITY AGREEMENT AND THE
ASSOCIATED OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE PURCHASE TRANSACTION OR
PROMISSORY NOTE AS THOUGH THE DEFAULT DID NOT OCCUR. THE
COVERED PERSON'S OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE SECURITY AGREEMENT AND
THE ASSOCIATED OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE PURCHASE TRANSACTION OR
PROMISSORY NOTE RESUME AS THOUGH THE DEFAULT DID NOT OCCUR.
5-9.4-106. Enforcement - unfair or deceptive trade practice.
A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 9.4 IS AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE UNDER THE "COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT",
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-105 (1)(rrrr).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 44-20-130.5 as
follows:
44-20-130.5. Right to return - enforcement - unfair or
deceptive trade practice - definitions - rules.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "DEALER" MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE DEALER OR A USED MOTOR
-6- HB26-1261

VEHICLE DEALER.
(b) "QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 5-9.4-101 (3).
(2) (a) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, A CONSUMER
WHO PURCHASES A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE FROM A DEALER HAS A
RIGHT TO RETURN THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO THE DEALER WITHIN THREE
BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE LATER OF THE CONSUMER RECEIVING DELIVERY
OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE CONSUMER PURCHASING THE MOTOR
VEHICLE.
(b) IF A CONSUMER RETURNS A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE DEALER, WITHIN THREE BUSINESS DAYS, SHALL:
(I) REFUND THE AMOUNTS ACTUALLY PAID BY THE CONSUMER FOR
THE RETURNED VEHICLE MINUS THE FEES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(c)
OF THIS SECTION AND ANY COST OF REPAIRING THE RETURNED VEHICLE AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) TAKE ALL NECESSARY STEPS TO UNWIND OR CANCEL ANY
FINANCING OR LEASING ARRANGEMENTS RELATED TO THE RETURNED
VEHICLE; AND
(III) IF THE CONSUMER TRADED IN A VEHICLE AS PART OF THE
TRANSACTION:
(A) RETURN THE TRADE-IN VEHICLE TO THE CONSUMER IN
SUBSTANTIALLY THE SAME CONDITION IF THE DEALER STILL OWNS THE
VEHICLE; OR
(B) PAY THE CONSUMER THE AGREED TRADE-IN VALUE STATED IN
THE PURCHASE CONTRACT IF THE DEALER NO LONGER OWNS THE VEHICLE.
(3) TO EXERCISE THE RIGHT TO RETURN A QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE, A CONSUMER MUST:
-7- HB26-1261

(a) RETURN THE QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE TO THE DEALER'S
PLACE OF BUSINESS DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS WITHIN THE
THREE-BUSINESS-DAY RETURN PERIOD;
(b) SIGN THE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE OF THE QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE AND TRANSFER THE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE TO THE DEALER;
(c) PAY A REASONABLE RESTOCKING FEE AND ANY REASONABLE
EXCESS MILEAGE FEE, AS EACH IS DETERMINED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(4) OF THIS SECTION;
(d) RETURN ALL ITEMS RECEIVED AS PART OF THE TRANSACTION;
AND
(e) (I) RETURN THE QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE IN SUBSTANTIALLY
THE DELIVERED CONDITION, NOT INCLUDING ORDINARY WEAR AND TEAR
AND REASONABLE MILEAGE; OR
(II) PAY THE REASONABLE COST, NOT TO EXCEED ONE-HALF OF
ONE PERCENT OF THE VALUE OF THE QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE
POINT OF SALE, OF REPAIRING THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO SUBSTANTIALLY
THE DELIVERED CONDITION.
(4) IF A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE IS RETURNED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, A DEALER MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE RESTOCKING FEE OF
TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS OR MORE BUT NOT TO EXCEED THE LOWER OF SIX
HUNDRED DOLLARS OR ONE AND ONE-HALF PERCENT OF THE TOTAL SALE
PRICE OF THE RETURNED MOTOR VEHICLE. IN ADDITION TO THE
RESTOCKING FEE, THE DEALER MAY CHARGE AN EXCESS MILEAGE FEE TO
COMPENSATE THE DEALER FOR EXCESS MILEAGE BEYOND REASONABLE
MILEAGE. BOTH THE RESTOCKING FEE AND THE EXCESS MILEAGE FEE ARE
DEDUCTED FROM THE CONSUMER'S REFUND. THE DEALER SHALL NOT
REQUIRE THE CONSUMER TO PAY THE RESTOCKING FEE OR THE EXCESS
-8- HB26-1261

MILEAGE FEE BEFORE RETURNING THE QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(5) (a) (I) A SECURITY INTEREST, PROMISSORY NOTE, OR
FINANCING INSTRUMENT FOR THE PURCHASE OF A QUALIFIED MOTOR
VEHICLE FROM A DEALER DOES NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL THE FOURTH
BUSINESS DAY AFTER THE LATER OF THE CONSUMER PURCHASING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE CONSUMER RECEIVING DELIVERY OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE.
(II) UPON NOTICE FROM A DEALER THAT A PURCHASE CONTRACT
HAS BEEN CANCELED UNDER THIS SECTION, A HOLDER OF A SECURITY
INTEREST, PROMISSORY NOTE, OR FINANCING INSTRUMENT SHALL
PROMPTLY:
(A) REVERSE THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE CONSUMER UNDER THE
SECURITY INTEREST, PROMISSORY NOTE, OR FINANCING INSTRUMENT; AND
(B) REFUND THE PAYMENTS RECEIVED FROM OR ON BEHALF OF THE
CONSUMER.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (5) DOES NOT APPLY IF THE CONSUMER HAS
FINANCED THE PURCHASE OF A QUALIFIED MOTOR VEHICLE WITHOUT
GRANTING A SECURITY INTEREST IN THE MOTOR VEHICLE TO OBTAIN THE
FINANCING.
(6) A DEALER SHALL NOT:
(a) CHARGE OR ATTEMPT TO CHARGE A CONSUMER FOR
UNREASONABLE EXCESS MILEAGE OR UNREASONABLE COST OF REPAIRS;
OR
(b) USE A CLAIM OF EXCESS MILEAGE OR REPAIRS TO DELAY
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(7) A WAIVER OF THE RIGHT TO RETURN A QUALIFIED MOTOR
-9- HB26-1261

VEHICLE UNDER THIS SECTION IS VOID AS AGAINST PUBLIC POLICY.
(8) (a) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE UNDER THE "COLORADO CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT",
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-105 (1)(qqqq).
(b) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDIES, A CONSUMER HARMED
BY A DEALER'S VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY RECOVER ACTUAL
DAMAGES, REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS, AND, FOR A WILLFUL
OR KNOWING VIOLATION, TREBLE DAMAGES.
(9) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND ENFORCE
THIS SECTION. THE RULES MAY INCLUDE DEFINITIONS FOR "REASONABLE
MILEAGE", "ORDINARY WEAR AND TEAR", "REASONABLE RESTOCKING
FEE", AND "UNREASONABLE COST OF REPAIRS".
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add
(1)(qqqq) and (1)(rrrr) as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(qqqq) VIOLATES SECTION 44-20-130.5;
(rrrr) VIOLATES ARTICLE 9.4 OF TITLE 5.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
-10- HB26-1261

to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to motor vehicle sales made on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-11- HB26-1261